Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1466
Owner, defined.

Owner shall mean one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom are vested (a) all or a part of the legal title to property or (b) all or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of a mobile home park, and shall include a mortgagee in possession.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 17.